District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-938

Penalties — Promotion expenses.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 489, ch. 397, § 38
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-156, § 2(b), 27 DCR 5113
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 448(c), 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-938.
1981 Ed., § 29-1138.
1973 Ed., § 29-838.